Louisiana, session 2026, HB499.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1104.2(C) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1104.2. Unitization
* * *
C.(1) An order for unit operation shall provide for just and equitable sharing
of the benefits generated from use of such tracts for geologic storage and shall
provide for just and equitable compensation to all owners in interest, including the
storage operator, other owners in interest who consented in writing to geologic
storage, and owners in interest who did not consent in writing to geologic storage,
except that the order shall not vary, alter, or otherwise apply a standard of benefit
sharing or compensation to the terms of any contracts between the storage operator
and any owner in interest. The order shall set forth the method, formula, or other
basis by which the just and equitable sharing of the benefits shall be determined,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-281 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 499
including the timing of payments thereof. In determining the method, formula, or
other basis, the commissioner may take into consideration such factors that include
but are not limited to the computational modeling submitted by an existing or
proposed storage operator, whether there is an impact to a tract, the extent of any
impact to a tract, each separately owned tract's proportionate share of the total
surface acreage contributed to the storage unit, the costs required to perform the unit
operation, and the viability of any third-party geologic storage projects within the
storage unit and any associated third-party contracts executed by an owner in
interest.
(2) A nonconsenting owner in interest shall not be compensated with an
amount per acre which is less than the average compensation paid per acre to all
other owners in interest in the storage unit.
D. Judicial review of orders, rules, and regulations issued by the
commissioner pursuant to this Section shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions
and requirements of R.S. 30:12. Additionally, subject to timely filing for court
review pursuant to R.S. 30:12, the proposed storage unit operator or any owner in
interest who has not entered into an agreement for geologic storage with the
proposed storage unit operator shall have the right to have the reviewing court
determine whether the purpose for the storage unit is public and necessary, whether
the compensation provided for is just, and, if not, the amount of just compensation
due. As to any owner in interest having the right to have a reviewing court
determine whether the compensation is just under this Subsection, the court's review
in those instances shall be limited to the compensation affecting that specific owner
in interest. The court may request all information necessary to determine just
compensation. The review of whether the compensation is just may be heard
through a trial by jury if timely requested by any party. Judicial reviews conducted
under this Subsection shall be tried by preference and shall be conducted with the
greatest possible dispatch.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-281 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 499